sources-apertium-nor-eng.dix
    <pardef n="prnpers">
      <e><p><l><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></l> <r><s n="subj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></l> <r><s n="obj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></l> <r><s n="subj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></l> <r><s n="obj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></l>  <r><s n="subj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></l>  <r><s n="obj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></l>  <r><s n="subj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></l>  <r><s n="obj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></l> <r><s n="subj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></l> <r><s n="obj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></l> <r><s n="subj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></l> <r><s n="obj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></l>  <r><s n="subj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></l>  <r><s n="obj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></l>  <r><s n="subj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></l>  <r><s n="obj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dem_dem">
      <e r="LR"> <p><l><s n="m"/></l>	<r></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l><s n="nt"/></l>	<r></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l><s n="f"/></l>	<r></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><s n="pl"/></l>	<r><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><s n="GD"/></l>	<r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e vl="nob"><p><l>jeg<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/></l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/></r></p><par n="prnpers"/></e>
    <e vl="nno"><p><l>eg<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/></l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/></r></p><par n="prnpers"/></e>
    <e><p><l>vi<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/></l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/></r></p><par n="prnpers"/></e>
    <e><p><l>du<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/></l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/></r></p><par n="prnpers"/></e>
    <e><p><l>De<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/></l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/></r></p><par n="prnpers"/></e>
    <e vl="nob"><p><l>dere<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/></l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/></r></p><par n="prnpers"/></e>
    <e vl="nno"><p><l>de<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/></l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/></r></p><par n="prnpers"/></e>
    <e><p><l>det<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/></l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/></r></p><par n="prnpers"/></e>
    <e><p><l>den<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/></l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/></r></p><par n="prnpers"/></e>
    <e vl="nob"><p><l>hun<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/></l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/></r></p><par n="prnpers"/></e>
    <e vl="nno"><p><l>ho<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/></l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/></r></p><par n="prnpers"/></e>
    <e><p><l>han<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/></l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/></r></p><par n="prnpers"/></e>
    <e vl="nob"><p><l>de<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/></l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/></r></p><par n="prnpers"/></e>
    <e vl="nno"><p><l>dei<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/></l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/></r></p><par n="prnpers"/></e>
    <e vl="nob"><p><l>en<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></l><r>a<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e vl="nno"><p><l>ein<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></l><r>a<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e><p><l>ingen<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></l><r>no<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e><p><l>denne<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/></l><r>this<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e><p><l>den<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/></l><r>that<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e><p><l>sånn<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/></l><r>that<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e vl="nob"><p><l>hver<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></l><r>each<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e vl="nno"><p><l>kvar<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></l><r>each<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e vl="nob"><p><l>enhver<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></l><r>any<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e vl="nno"><p><l>kvar<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></l><r>any<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e><p><l>så<b/>mange<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></l><r>so<b/>many<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e><p><l>så<b/>mange<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></l><r>as<b/>many<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e vl="nob"><p><l>de<b/>fleste<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></l><r>the<b/>most<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e vl="nno"><p><l>dei<b/>fleste<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></l><r>the<b/>most<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e vl="nob"><p><l>egen<s n="det"/><s n="emph"/></l><r>own<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e vl="nno"><p><l>eigen<s n="det"/><s n="emph"/></l><r>own<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e><p><l>forrige<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/></l><r>previous<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e><p><l>neste<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/></l><r>next<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e vl="nob"><p><l>hvilken<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/></l><r>which<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e vl="nno"><p><l>kva<b/>for<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/></l><r>which<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e vl="nob"><p><l>jeg<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></l><r>my<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e vl="nno"><p><l>eg<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></l><r>my<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e><p><l>du<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></l><r>your<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e vl="nob"><p><l>de<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></l><r>your<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e vl="nno"><p><l>dei<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></l><r>your<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>De<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/></l><r>your<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e><p><l>vi<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></l><r>our<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e><p><l>han<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></l><r>his<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e vl="nob"><p><l>hun<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></l><r>her<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e vl="nno"><p><l>ho<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></l><r>her<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e vl="nob"><p><l>dere<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></l><r>their<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e vl="nno"><p><l>de<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></l><r>their<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
    <e><p><l>seg<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></l><r>his<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="dem_dem"/></e>
